Utah statutes.
59-14-213.   Contraband goods.

(1)  Any cigarettes in violation of the requirements of this chapter or of any state or federal law, including Sections 59-14-203, 59-14-205, 59-14-209, 59-14-211, Subsection 59-14-212(1), or Section 59-14-214 are contraband goods and may be seized without a warrant by the commission, its employees, or any peace officer of the state or its political subdivisions.

(2)  Any goods seized pursuant to Subsection (1) shall be delivered to the commission and destroyed.

(3)  Any cigarettes, as defined in Subsection 59-22-202(4), in violation of Section 59-14-604 are contraband goods and may be seized in accordance with Subsections (1) and (2).



Amended by Chapter 204, 2005 General Session

